Colorado, session 2026A, SB185.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 2-3-1704, add (13),
(14), and (15) as follows:
2-3-1704. Powers and duties of the joint technology committee.
(13) THE COMMITTEE MAY CALL THE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY
OFFICER TO TESTIFY BEFORE THE COMMITTEE REGARDING THE WRITTEN
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY COMPLIANCE REPORT THAT THE CHIEF
INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER IS REQUIRED TO SUBMIT TO THE
COMMITTEE PURSUANT TO SECTION 24-37.5-403 (2)(j).
(14) WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE DAY THAT THE CHIEF
INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER OF THE OFFICE OF INFORMATION
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

TECHNOLOGY FILES A WRITTEN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY
COMPLIANCE REPORT AS REQUIRED BY SECTION 24-37.5-403 (2)(j), THE
COMMITTEE MAY VOTE TO FORMALLY REQUEST THAT THE LEGISLATIVE
AUDIT COMMITTEE, PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-108, VOTE TO DIRECT A
SPECIAL INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY AUDIT OF THE OFFICE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE AUDITOR'S AUTHORITY RELATED TO
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 2-3-103
(1.5), IF:
(a) THE WRITTEN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY
COMPLIANCE REPORT REQUIRED BY SECTION 24-37.5-403 (2)(j) INDICATES
THAT ONE OR MORE AUDIT RECOMMENDATIONS MADE BY THE STATE
AUDITOR IS UNRESOLVED TWO OR MORE YEARS PAST THE IMPLEMENTATION
DATE FOR THE AUDIT RECOMMENDATION TO WHICH THE OFFICE COMMITTED
IN A PRIOR COMPLIANCE REPORT; OR
(b) A MATERIAL DISCREPANCY EXISTS BETWEEN A REPRESENTATION
MADE IN THE WRITTEN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY COMPLIANCE
REPORT REQUIRED BY SECTION 24-37.5-403 (2)(j) AND A FINDING MADE IN
A PREVIOUS AUDIT BY THE STATE AUDITOR.
(15) (a) IF A MAJORITY OF THE COMMITTEE VOTES TO REQUEST THAT
THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE DIRECT A SPECIAL INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SECURITY AUDIT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (14) OF THIS
SECTION AND IF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE VOTES
TO APPROVE AN AUDIT PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-108, THE STATE AUDITOR
SHALL CONDUCT THE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY AUDIT AND MAY
CONTRACT WITH A QUALIFIED THIRD-PARTY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
SECURITY FIRM TO CONDUCT THE AUDIT. THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL OBTAIN
INPUT FROM THE OFFICE OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY WHEN THE STATE
AUDITOR DETERMINES THE SCOPE AND BOUNDARIES OF THE AUDIT, TAKING
INTO CONSIDERATION THE RESOURCES AVAILABLE TO THE OFFICE TO
REIMBURSE THE AUDITOR FOR THE COST OF THE AUDIT PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (15)(b) OF THIS SECTION.
(b) THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL, WITHIN TWELVE MONTHS OF THE
AFFIRMATIVE VOTE OF A MAJORITY OF THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE,
PRODUCE AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY AUDIT REPORT AND
SUBMIT THE AUDIT REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE AUDIT COMMITTEE, AFTER
WHICH THE STATE AUDITOR SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT TO THE COMMITTEE,
PAGE 2-SENATE BILL 26-185

THE JOINT BUDGET COMMITTEE, AND THE GOVERNOR. PURSUANT TO SECTION
2-3-110, THE OFFICE SHALL REIMBURSE THE STATE AUDITOR FOR AN AUDIT
CONDUCTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (14) OF THIS SECTION. THE
REIMBURSEMENT MAY BE PAID FROM THE TECHNOLOGY RISK PREVENTION
AND RESPONSE FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-37.5-120.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37.5-105, amend
(3)(c), (3)(d), (6)(c), and (6)(d); and add (3)(f), (4.5), and (6)(e) as follows:
24-37.5-105. Office - roles - responsibilities - state search
interface - rules - legislative declaration - definitions.
(3) The office shall:
(c) Assist the joint technology committee as necessary to facilitate
the committee's oversight of the office; and
(d) Establish, maintain, and keep an inventory of information
technology owned by or held in trust for every state agency; AND
(f) (I) ESTABLISH, MAINTAIN, KEEP, QUARTERLY UPDATE, AND MAKE
AVAILABLE TO STATE AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY LEADERSHIP AND
THE MEMBERS OF THE JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, A LIST OF ALL ACTIVE
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY VENDOR CONTRACTS FOR STATE AGENCIES AS
DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION. FOR EACH INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY VENDOR CONTRACT, THE LIST MUST INCLUDE:
(A) THE NAME OF THE VENDOR;
(B) THE VALUE OF THE CONTRACT;
(C) THE DATE ON WHICH THE CONTRACT EXPIRES; AND
(D) THE DATA CLASSIFICATION - BUSINESS CRITICALITY TIER OF THE
CONTRACT.
(II) IF A STATE AGENCY INITIATES SOLICITATIONS AND CONTRACTS
FOR INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY RESOURCES WITH PRIOR APPROVAL OF THE
PROCUREMENT OFFICIAL FOR THE OFFICE PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF
THIS SECTION, THE STATE AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE OFFICE THE
PAGE 3-SENATE BILL 26-185

INFORMATION SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (3)(f)(I) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY VENDOR CONTRACT, AND THE OFFICE SHALL
INCLUDE THE INFORMATION IN THE LIST REQUIRED BY THIS SUBSECTION
(3)(f).
(III) THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT A ONE-TIME INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY BUDGET REQUEST TO THE JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE FOR
THE COST OF BUILDING AND IMPLEMENTING THE LIST REQUIRED BY THIS
SUBSECTION (3)(f). IF, AFTER THE BUDGET REQUEST IS APPROVED, THE
OFFICE DETERMINES THAT MORE MONEY IS NEEDED TO IMPLEMENT AND
MAINTAIN THE LIST, THE OFFICE MAY REQUEST THAT THE GENERAL
ASSEMBLY ALLOCATE ADDITIONAL MONEY FROM THE TECHNOLOGY RISK
PREVENTION AND RESPONSE FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-37.5-120.
(4.5) Technical information technology standards.
(a) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (4.5)(b) OF THIS
SECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL NOT PUBLISH OR IMPLEMENT A TECHNICAL
INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY STANDARD THAT IS ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4) OF THIS SECTION, AND THE STANDARD IS VOID, UNLESS:
(I) THE OFFICE HAS PUBLICLY POSTED THE STANDARD; AND
(II) THE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER HAS APPROVED THE
STANDARD, IF THE STANDARD RELATES TO SECURITY, ACCESS CONTROLS, OR
THE HANDLING OF DATA.
(b) THE PROVISIONS OF SUBSECTION (4.5)(a) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT
APPLY WHEN THE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER DETERMINES IN
WRITING THAT AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY EMERGENCY
EXISTS. FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION (4.5), AN INFORMATION
TECHNOLOGY SECURITY EMERGENCY MEANS A SITUATION IN WHICH AN
IMMINENT OR ACTIVE THREAT TO STATE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
SYSTEMS REQUIRES THE IMMEDIATE IMPLEMENTATION OF A SECURITY
STANDARD TO PREVENT OR MITIGATE SIGNIFICANT HARM TO STATE DATA,
SYSTEMS, OR OPERATIONS.
(c) IF THE OFFICE IMPLEMENTS A SECURITY STANDARD IN RESPONSE
TO AN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY EMERGENCY PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4.5)(b) OF THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE SHALL POST THE
PAGE 4-SENATE BILL 26-185

STANDARD ON THE OFFICE'S WEBSITE WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS OF THE
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE SECURITY STANDARD. A SECURITY STANDARD
IMPLEMENTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4.5)(b) OF THIS SECTION EXPIRES
NINETY DAYS AFTER IMPLEMENTATION UNLESS, PRIOR TO EXPIRATION, THE
OFFICE COMPLIES WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (4.5)(a) OF THIS
SECTION.
(6) Technology purchasing. The office shall initiate the
procurement of information technology resources for state agencies and
enter into agreements or contracts on behalf of a state agency, multiple
agencies, or the office, or be a party to procurement contracts that are
initiated by state agencies. A state agency may initiate solicitations and
contracts for information technology resources only with prior approval of
the procurement official for the office, and must include provisions
allowing the office to enforce technology and security standards or conduct
due diligence or audits of the contractors. If the state agency does not
receive written approval or disapproval from the procurement official for
the office within thirty business days after submitting the procurement
request to the office for review, the state agency may assume that it has
received the prior approval of the office, as required by this subsection (6),
and is authorized to initiate the procurement or solicitation process. In
connection with the procurement of information technology resources, the
office shall:
(c) Oversee information technology vendors on behalf of the state
and state agencies except when delegated to a state agency pursuant to
section 24-37.5-105.4; and
(d) If the office does not have oversight of an information
technology or services contract, ensure that the state agency with oversight
of the contract operates pursuant to section 24-37.5-105.4 regarding the
delegation of authority; AND
(e) IF A CONTRACT PROVIDES ONGOING SERVICE AND DELIVERY TO
COLORADANS, ENSURE THAT THE CONTRACT MAINTAINS CURRENT
ARCHITECTURE DIAGRAMS THAT ARE UPDATED AT LEAST ANNUALLY.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37.5-105.4, amend
(1) introductory portion as follows:
PAGE 5-SENATE BILL 26-185

24-37.5-105.4. Delegation of authority.
(1) The chief information officer may delegate an information
technology function of the office to another state agency by agreement or
other means authorized by law, EXCEPT THAT THE CHIEF INFORMATION
OFFICER SHALL NOT DELEGATE A DUTY, RESPONSIBILITY, OR POWER OF THE
CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER. The chief information officer may
delegate an information technology function of the office if in the judgment
of the director of the state agency and the chief information officer:
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-37.5-403, amend
(1), (2)(h), and (2)(i); and add (2)(j), (2)(k), and (4) as follows:
24-37.5-403. Chief information security officer - duties and
responsibilities.
(1) The chief information officer shall appoint a chief information
security officer who shall serve at the pleasure of the chief information
officer. The security officer shall report to and be under the supervision of
the chief information officer. The security officer shall exhibit a
background and expertise in security and risk management for
communications and information TECHNOLOGY resources. In the event the
security officer is unavailable to perform the duties and responsibilities
under this part 4, all powers and authority granted to the security officer
may MUST be exercised by the chief information officer.
(2) The chief information security officer shall:
(h) In coordination and consultation with the office of state planning
and budgeting and the chief information officer, review public agency
budget requests related to information security systems and approve such
budget requests for state agencies other than the legislative department; and
(i) Coordinate with the Colorado commission on higher education
for purposes of reviewing and commenting TO REVIEW AND COMMENT on
information security plans adopted by institutions of higher education that
are submitted pursuant to section 24-37.5-404.5 (3);
(j) SUBMIT TO THE JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, ON OR BEFORE
NOVEMBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR
PAGE 6-SENATE BILL 26-185

THEREAFTER, A WRITTEN INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SECURITY
COMPLIANCE REPORT THAT INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION:
(I) THE OFFICE'S CURRENT COMPLIANCE STATUS WITH APPLICABLE
SECURITY STANDARDS;
(II) ALL OPEN AUDIT RECOMMENDATIONS MADE BY THE OFFICE OF
THE STATE AUDITOR AND THE DATE ON WHICH EACH RECOMMENDATION WAS
MADE;
(III) A TIMELINE FOR REMEDIATION FOR EACH OPEN
RECOMMENDATION MADE BY THE OFFICE OF THE STATE AUDITOR; AND
(IV) A MITIGATION PLAN OR COMPENSATING CONTROLS FOR THE
REMEDIATION OF EACH OPEN RECOMMENDATION MADE BY THE OFFICE OF
THE STATE AUDITOR; AND
(k) (I) SUBMIT TO THE JOINT TECHNOLOGY COMMITTEE, ON OR
BEFORE NOVEMBER 1, 2027, AND ON OR BEFORE NOVEMBER 1 OF EACH YEAR
THEREAFTER, A WRITTEN STATEWIDE INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY
SECURITY RISK REPORT THAT ASSESSES THE OVERALL SECURITY RISK
POSTURE OF STATE AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS.
(II) TO SUPPORT THE PREPARATION OF THE SECURITY RISK REPORT
REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2)(k)(I) OF THIS SECTION, THE CHIEF
INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER MAY CONDUCT EVALUATIONS OF STATE
AGENCY INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SYSTEMS AS THE CHIEF INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICER DEEMS NECESSARY, INCLUDING PENETRATION TESTING,
VULNERABILITY SCANNING, CONFIGURATION EVALUATIONS, AND VENDOR
AND SYSTEM REVIEWS.
(III) EACH STATE AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE TO THE CHIEF
INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER, UPON REQUEST, THE ACCESS AND
INFORMATION NECESSARY TO CONDUCT EVALUATIONS PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (2)(k)(II) OF THIS SECTION, INCLUDING SYSTEM ACCESS,
PRODUCT INFORMATION, AND ARCHITECTURE INFORMATION.
(4) THE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER, OR THE CHIEF
INFORMATION OFFICER IF THE SECURITY OFFICER IS UNAVAILABLE, SHALL
PERFORM THE DUTIES AND UPHOLD THE RESPONSIBILITIES ASSIGNED TO THE
PAGE 7-SENATE BILL 26-185

CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER PURSUANT TO THIS PART 4. THE
CHIEF INFORMATION OFFICER SHALL NOT DELEGATE THE DUTIES,
RESPONSIBILITIES, OR POWERS OF THE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY
OFFICER TO ANY PERSON OTHER THAN THE CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY
OFFICER. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION PREVENTS THE CHIEF INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICER FROM DIRECTING PERSONNEL WITHIN THE INFORMATION
SECURITY OFFICE TO CARRY OUT SECURITY FUNCTIONS UNDER THE CHIEF
INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER'S SUPERVISION AND ACCOUNTABILITY. THE
CHIEF INFORMATION SECURITY OFFICER IS RESPONSIBLE FOR THE ACCURACY
OF THE COMPLIANCE REPORT REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (2)(j) OF THIS
SECTION AND THE SECURITY RISK REPORT REQUIRED IN SUBSECTION (2)(k)
OF THIS SECTION, REGARDLESS OF WHICH PERSONNEL CONTRIBUTED TO THE
PREPARATION OF THE REPORTS.
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 8-SENATE BILL 26-185

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
James Rashad Coleman, Sr. Julie McCluskie
PRESIDENT OF SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
____________________________ ____________________________
Esther van Mourik Vanessa Reilly
SECRETARY OF CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE
THE SENATE OF REPRESENTATIVES
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-SENATE BILL 26-185